North Carolina, session 2025, HB770.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 50 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new Article
to read:
"Article 6.
"Complex Family Financial Cases.
"§ 50-110. Definitions.
The following definitions shall apply in this Article:
(1) Chief hearing officer. – A hearing officer designated by the Chief Justice of
the North Carolina Supreme Court who determines which cases are designated
as complex family financial cases, assigns all cases designated as complex
family financial cases, and prepares any required reports.
(2) Complex family financial case. – Any claim or claims approved for hearing
as a complex family financial case as provided for by this Article. Claims
eligible for hearing as a complex family financial case are equitable
distribution, alimony, post separation support, child support, or any
combination of those claims.
(3) Hearing officer or complex family financial hearing officer. – An individual
who has been appointed pursuant to this Article to hear and enter orders in
complex family financial cases.
"§ 50-111. Complex family financial hearing officer.
(a) Complex family financial hearing officers shall be employees of the Administrative
Office of the Courts and shall be appointed by the Chief Justice of the North Carolina Supreme
Court. The Chief Justice of the North Carolina Supreme Court shall designate one hearing officer
as chief hearing officer.
(b) To serve as a hearing officer or chief hearing officer, the individual must meet the
following minimum qualifications:
(1) Attorney licensed in North Carolina and in good standing with the North
Carolina State Bar.
(2) Substantial involvement handling complex family financial cases during the
10 calendar years prior to the year of application, including the following:
*H770-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. Average at least 600 hours per year handling complex family financial
cases.
b. No less than 400 hours handling complex family financial cases in any
one year.
(3) During the five calendar years prior to the application:
a. Completed at least 45 hours of continuing legal education credits in
family law, nine of which may be in related fields, including taxation,
trial advocacy, evidence, negotiation, including training in mediation,
arbitration, and collaborative law, real property, estate planning and
probate law, trusts, business organizations, employee benefits,
bankruptcy, and immigration law. Only nine hours will be recognized
for attendance at an extended negotiation or mediation training course.
Parenting coordinator training will not qualify for family law or related
field hours.
b. A minimum of six hours continuing legal education must have been
completed in each of those five years.
(4) Satisfactory peer review by 10 lawyers or judges who are identified by the
applicant. The identified individuals must have personal knowledge of the
competence and qualification of the applicant in handling complex family
financial matters at the pretrial, trial, and posttrial level. All identified
individuals must be licensed and in good standing to practice law in the State
of North Carolina. No identified individual may be related by blood or
marriage to the applicant nor be a colleague at the applicant's place of
employment at the time of the application.
(c) A hearing officer and the chief hearing officer shall receive the annual salary set forth
in the Current Operations Appropriations Act for business court judges and the chief business
court judge, and reimbursement on the same basis as State employees generally by G.S. 138-6(a),
provided that no travel allowance be paid for travel within a hearing officer's county of residence.
The Administrative Office of the Courts may also reimburse a hearing officer, in addition to the
above funds for travel, for travel and subsistence expenses incurred for professional education.
(d) In lieu of merit and other increment raises paid to regular State employees, a hearing
officer shall receive as longevity pay an annual amount equal to four and eight-tenths percent
(4.8%) of the annual salary set forth in the Current Operations Appropriations Act payable
monthly after five years of service, nine and six-tenths percent (9.6%) after 10 years of service,
fourteen and four-tenths percent (14.4%) after 15 years of service, nineteen and two-tenths
percent (19.2%) after 20 years of service, and twenty-four percent (24%) after 25 years of service.
"Service" means service as a justice or judge of the General Court of Justice, as a member of the
Utilities Commission, as an administrative law judge, as director or assistant director of the
Administrative Office of the Courts, or as a hearing officer. Service shall also mean service as a
district attorney or as a clerk of superior court.
"§ 50-112. Authority and duties of a complex family financial case hearing officer.
(a) A hearing officer under this Article has the following authority and responsibilities in
all complex family financial cases:
(1) To conduct hearings and to ensure that the parties' due process rights are
protected.
(2) To take testimony and establish a record.
(3) To evaluate evidence and make decisions regarding the issues being heard.
(4) To enter temporary, interim, and final orders related to the issues being heard
that have the same force and effect as orders entered by a district court judge.
(5) To enter orders granting or denying any motion filed under G.S. 1A-1 or any
local rules of court for the county in which the action was filed related to
Page 2 House Bill 770-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
actions under this Chapter that have the same force and effect as orders entered
by a district court judge.
(6) To subpoena witnesses and documents.
(b) A hearing officer under this Article is authorized to conduct hearings on complex
family financial cases statewide.
(c) A hearing officer must complete at least nine hours of continuing legal education
credits in family law or related fields each year, including taxation, trial advocacy, evidence,
negotiation (including training in mediation, arbitration, and collaborative law), real property,
estate planning and probate law, trusts, business organizations, employee benefits, bankruptcy,
and immigration law. Only one hour per year will be recognized for attendance at negotiation or
mediation training, and parenting coordinator training will not qualify for family law or related
field hours.
"§ 50-113. Designation of a complex family financial claim.
(a) A party designating a claim as a complex family financial claim shall file a Notice of
Designation in the district court in which the action has been filed and shall contemporaneously
serve the notice on all parties or counsel and on the chief hearing officer. The Notice of
Designation shall, in good faith and based on information reasonably available, succinctly state
each applicable factor provided in G.S. 50-114, the reasons supporting each factor for
designation as a complex family financial claim, and any other information supporting
designation as a complex family financial claim. Any factor or reasons supporting the designation
not asserted shall be deemed conclusively waived.
(b) Within 30 days after service of the Notice of Designation, any other party may, in
good faith, file and serve an opposition to the designation of the claim as a complex family
financial claim. The opposition to the designation of the claim shall assert all reasons for which
the party opposing designation objects to the designation, and any reason not asserted shall be
deemed conclusively waived. The opposition to the designation shall be served on each opposing
party and the chief hearing officer and shall be filed in the district court in which the action has
been filed.
(c) Based on the written Notice of Designation and any opposition filed, the chief hearing
officer shall determine whether the action should be designated as a complex family financial
claim by written order entered within 45 days of service of the Notice of Designation.
(d) Each party shall pay equal shares of the additional filing fee as required under
G.S. 7A-305. Only one additional filing fee shall be required per complex family financial case.
(e) Once an order granting designation of a claim as a complex family financial claim is
entered, that claim shall be designated and administered as a complex family financial case and
assigned to a hearing officer by the chief hearing officer. All proceedings related to the claims
designated as a complex family financial claim shall be before the hearing officer to whom the
complex family financial case has been assigned. If complex family financial claim status is
denied, the claim shall be heard with any other claims filed under this Chapter.
(f) Complex family financial cases are subject to all provisions of Article 1 of this
Chapter, the North Carolina Rules of Civil Procedure, the North Carolina Rules of Evidence, and
any applicable local rules of court for the county in which the complex family financial case is
pending.
"§ 50-114. Factors for complex family financial case determination.
The chief hearing officer shall consider each of the following factors in determining whether
a claim or claims shall be designated as a complex family financial case:
(1) Valuation and classification issues related to trusts, including active and
passive increases or decreases in value.
(2) Valuation and classification issues related to businesses, including active or
passive increases or decreases in value.
House Bill 770-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Valuation and classification of real property, including active or passive
increases or decreases in value.
(4) Valuation and classification issues regarding complex retirement or other
employment benefits, including employee stock ownership plans, stock
options, profit sharing, defined contribution plans, and defined benefit plans.
(5) Valuation and classification of profits, bonuses, or other income or assets
received after the date of separation.
(6) Active or passive changes in value to separate property during the marriage.
(7) Tax issues arising from the distribution of assets and debts, including tax loss
carryforwards, refunds, credits, or tax consequences.
(8) Whether there are loans or transfers between businesses or shareholders.
(9) Whether there are third-party defendants.
(10) Validity of a premarital or property settlement agreement pled in defense to
an equitable distribution, alimony, post separation support, or child support
case.
(11) Total value of real and personal property.
(12) Calculation of income for spousal support, child support, or both when income
includes non W-2 income.
(13) Total length of time requested for trial on the issues detailed on the Notice of
Designation.
Claims which have been filed in excess of 365 days shall be given priority over claims filed
less than 365 days, and requested trial dates for the complex family financial case in excess of
15 days shall be given priority.
"§ 50-115. Complex family financial hearings.
(a) Motion hearings shall be held virtually unless the assigned hearing officer determines
good cause exists to hold in the hearing in person. If an in-person hearing is ordered, it shall be
held at the courthouse in the county in which the action was filed in an available district or
superior courtroom staffed by a deputy or assistant clerk and bailiff.
(b) Hearings on the issues designated as a complex family financial case shall be held in
person at the courthouse in the county in which the action was filed in an available district or
superior courtroom staffed by a deputy or assistant clerk and bailiff.
(c) All complex family financial hearings must be recorded and exhibits maintained as
required for any other matter.
(d) Any hearing on final disposition of the complex family financial case must be
scheduled on consecutive days.
"§ 50-116. Appeal from orders of the complex family financial case hearing officer.
Appeals of orders entered by a hearing officer shall be as provided for in G.S. 7A-27(b)."
SECTION 2.1. Three hearing officers shall be appointed by the Chief Justice of the
North Carolina Supreme Court who meet the requirements of G.S. 50-111(b). The Chief Justice
of the North Carolina Supreme Court shall designate one of the hearing officers as chief hearing
officer. The Chief Justice of the North Carolina Supreme Court has the authority to create
additional rules or procedures necessary to give effect to the provisions of this act.
SECTION 2.2. The chief hearing officer and the Administrative Office of the Courts
shall collaborate to prepare and submit an initial report to the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Fiscal Research Division on or before August 1,
2026, and shall provide an annual report on or before August 1 of each year thereafter, including
the following information:
(1) The total number of cases designated as complex family financial cases by
county.
(2) The total number of complex family financial cases disposed of.
Page 4 House Bill 770-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) The manner of disposition of each complex family financial case, including
the total number of cases for each type of disposition.
(4) The average length of final disposition hearings.
(5) The shortest, longest, and average length of time from designation to final
disposition.
(6) The total number of requests for designation as complex family financial
cases.
(7) Recommendations for improvement or expansion of the program.
Each annual report shall include data for the previous fiscal year.
SECTION 3. G.S. 7A-305 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7A-305. Costs in civil actions.
(a) In every civil action in the superior or district court, except for actions brought under
Chapter 50B of the General Statutes, shall be assessed:
(1) For the use of the courtroom and related judicial facilities, the sum of twelve
dollars ($12.00) in cases heard before a magistrate, and the sum of sixteen
dollars ($16.00) in district and superior court, to be remitted to the county in
which the judgment is rendered, except that in all cases in which the judgment
is rendered in facilities provided by a municipality, the facilities fee shall be
paid to the municipality. Funds derived from the facilities fees shall be used
in the same manner, for the same purposes, and subject to the same
restrictions, as facilities fees assessed in criminal actions.
(1a) For the upgrade, maintenance, and operation of the judicial and county
courthouse telecommunications and data connectivity, the sum of four dollars
($4.00), to be credited to the Court Information Technology Fund.
(2) For support of the General Court of Justice, the sum of one hundred eighty
dollars ($180.00) in the superior court and the sum of one hundred thirty
dollars ($130.00) in the district court except that if the case is assigned to a
magistrate the sum shall be eighty dollars ($80.00). If a case is designated as
a mandatory complex business case under G.S. 7A-45.4, upon assignment to
a Business Court Judge, the party filing the designation shall pay an additional
one thousand one hundred dollars ($1,100) for support of the General Court
of Justice. If a case is designated as a complex business case under Rule 2.1
and Rule 2.2 of the General Rules of Practice for the Superior and District
Courts, upon assignment to a Business Court Judge, the plaintiff shall pay an
additional one thousand one hundred dollars ($1,100) for support of the
General Court of Justice. Justice. If a claim is designated as a complex family
financial claim under G.S. 50-113, upon assignment to a complex family
financial hearing officer as defined in G.S. 50-110(3), each party shall equally
pay an additional one thousand one hundred dollars ($1,100) for support of
the General Court of Justice. Sums collected under this subdivision shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall remit the sum of
ninety-five cents ($.95) of each fee collected under this subdivision to the
North Carolina State Bar for the provision of services described in
G.S. 7A-474.19.
(a1) Costs apply to any and all additional and subsequent actions filed by amendment or
counterclaim to the original action brought under Chapter 50B of the General Statutes, unless
such additional and subsequent amendment or counterclaim to the action is limited to requests
for relief authorized by Chapter 50B of the General Statutes.
(a2) In every action for absolute divorce filed in the district court, a cost of seventy-five
dollars ($75.00) shall be assessed against the person filing the divorce action. Costs collected by
the clerk pursuant to this subsection shall be remitted to the State Treasurer, who shall deposit
House Bill 770-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
seventy-five dollars ($75.00) to the Domestic Violence Center Fund established under
G.S. 50B-9. Costs assessed under this subsection shall be in addition to any other costs assessed
under this section.
(a3), (a4) Repealed by Session Laws 2008-118, s. 2.9(c), effective July 1, 2008.
(a5) In every civil action in the superior or district court wherein a party files a pleading
containing one or more counterclaims, third-party complaints, or cross-claims, except for
counterclaim and cross-claim actions brought under Chapter 50B of the General Statutes for
which costs are assessed pursuant to subsection (a1) of this section, the following shall be
assessed:
(1) For the use of the courtroom and related judicial facilities, the sum of twelve
dollars ($12.00) in cases heard before a magistrate, and the sum of sixteen
dollars ($16.00) in district and superior court, to be remitted to the
municipality providing the facilities in which the judgment is rendered. If a
municipality does not provide the facilities in which the judgment is rendered,
the sum is to be remitted to the county in which the judgment is rendered.
Funds derived from the facilities' fees shall be used in the same manner, for
the same purposes, and subject to the same restrictions as facilities' fees
assessed in criminal actions.
(2) For the upgrade, maintenance, and operation of the judicial and county
courthouse phone systems, the sum of four dollars ($4.00), to be credited to
the Court Information Technology Fund.
(3) For support of the General Court of Justice, the sum of one hundred eighty
dollars ($180.00) in the superior court, except that if a case is assigned to a
special superior court judge as a complex business case under G.S. 7A-45.3,
filing fees shall be collected and disbursed in accordance with subsection (a)
of this section, and the sum of one hundred thirty dollars ($130.00) in the
district court, except that if the case is assigned to a magistrate, the sum shall
be eighty dollars ($80.00). Sums collected under this subdivision shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall remit the sum of
ninety-five cents ($.95) of each fee collected under this subdivision to the
North Carolina State Bar for the provision of services described in
G.S. 7A-474.19.
(b) On appeal, costs are cumulative, and when cases heard before a magistrate are
appealed to the district court, the General Court of Justice fee and the facilities fee applicable in
the district court shall be added to the fees assessed before the magistrate. When an order of the
clerk of the superior court is appealed to either the district court or the superior court, no
additional General Court of Justice fee or facilities fee shall be assessed.
(b1) When a defendant files an answer in an action filed as a small claim which requires
the entire case to be withdrawn from a magistrate and transferred to the district court, the
difference between the General Court of Justice fee and facilities fee applicable to the district
court and the General Court of Justice fee and facilities fee applicable to cases heard by a
magistrate shall be assessed. The defendant is responsible for paying the fee.
(c) The clerk of superior court, at the time of the filing of the papers initiating the action
or the appeal, shall collect as advance court costs, the facilities fee, General Court of Justice fee,
and the divorce fee imposed under subsection (a2) of this section, except in suits by an indigent.
The clerk shall also collect the fee for discovery procedures under Rule 27(a) and (b) at the time
of the filing of the verified petition.
(d) The following expenses, when incurred, are assessable or recoverable, as the case
may be. The expenses set forth in this subsection are complete and exclusive and constitute a
limit on the trial court's discretion to tax costs pursuant to G.S. 6-20:
(1) Witness fees, as provided by law.
Page 6 House Bill 770-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Jail fees, as provided by law.
(3) Counsel fees, as provided by law.
(4) Expense of service of process by certified mail and by publication.
(5) Costs on appeal to the superior court, or to the appellate division, as the case
may be, of the original transcript of testimony, if any, insofar as essential to
the appeal.
(6) Fees for personal service and civil process and other sheriff's fees, as provided
by law. Fees for personal service by a private process server may be
recoverable in an amount equal to the actual cost of such service or fifty
dollars ($50.00), whichever is less, unless the court finds that due to difficulty
of service a greater amount is appropriate.
(7) Fees of mediators appointed by the court, mediators agreed upon by the
parties, guardians ad litem, referees, receivers, commissioners, surveyors,
arbitrators, appraisers, and other similar court appointees, as provided by law.
The fee of such appointees shall include reasonable reimbursement for
stenographic assistance, when necessary.
(8) Fees of interpreters, when authorized and approved by the court.
(9) Premiums for surety bonds for prosecution, as authorized by G.S. 1-109.
(10) Reasonable and necessary expenses for stenographic and videographic
assistance directly related to the taking of depositions and for the cost of
deposition transcripts.
(11) Reasonable and necessary fees of expert witnesses solely for actual time spent
providing testimony at trial, deposition, or other proceedings.
(12) The fee assessed pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section
upon assignment of a case to a special superior court judge as a complex
business case.
Nothing in this subsection or in G.S. 6-20 shall be construed to limit the trial court's authority to
award fees and expenses in connection with pretrial discovery matters as provided in Rule 26(b)
or Rule 37 of the Rules of Civil Procedure, and no award of costs made pursuant to this section
or pursuant to G.S. 6-20 shall reverse or modify any such orders entered in connection with
pretrial discovery.
(e) Nothing in this section shall affect the liability of the respective parties for costs as
provided by law.
(f) For the support of the General Court of Justice, the sum of twenty dollars ($20.00)
shall accompany any filing of a notice of hearing on a motion not listed in G.S. 7A-308 that is
filed with the clerk. No costs shall be assessed to a notice of hearing on a motion containing as a
sole claim for relief the taxing of costs, including attorneys' fees, to a motion filed pursuant to
G.S. 1C-1602 or G.S. 1C-1603, or to a motion filed by a child support enforcement agency
established pursuant to Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act. No more than one fee shall
be assessed for any motion for which a notice of hearing is filed, regardless of whether the hearing
is continued, rescheduled, or otherwise delayed."
SECTION 4. G.S. 7A-27 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7A-27. Appeals of right from the courts of the trial divisions.
(a) Appeal lies of right directly to the Supreme Court in any of the following cases:
(1) All cases in which the defendant is convicted of murder in the first degree and
the judgment of the superior court includes a sentence of death.
(2) From any final judgment in a case designated as a mandatory complex
business case pursuant to G.S. 7A-45.4 or designated as a discretionary
complex business case pursuant to Rule 2.1 of the General Rules of Practice
for the Superior and District Courts.
House Bill 770-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) From any interlocutory order of a Business Court Judge that does any of the
following:
a. Affects a substantial right.
b. In effect determines the action and prevents a judgment from which an
appeal might be taken.
c. Discontinues the action.
d. Grants or refuses a new trial.
(4) Any trial court's decision regarding class action certification under G.S. 1A-1,
Rule 23.
(5) Repealed by Session Laws 2021-18, s. 1, effective July 1, 2021, and applicable
to appeals filed on or after that date.
(a1) Repealed by Session Laws 2016-125, s. 22(b), 4th Ex. Sess., effective December 1,
2016.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, appeal lies of right directly to the
Court of Appeals in any of the following cases:
(1) From any final judgment of a superior court, other than one based on a plea of
guilty or nolo contendere, including any final judgment entered upon review
of a decision of an administrative agency, except for a final judgment entered
upon review of a court martial under G.S. 127A-62.
(2) From any final judgment of a district court in a civil action.
(3) From any interlocutory order or judgment of a superior court or district court
in a civil action or proceeding that does any of the following:
a. Affects a substantial right.
b. In effect determines the action and prevents a judgment from which an
appeal might be taken.
c. Discontinues the action.
d. Grants or refuses a new trial.
e. Determines a claim prosecuted under G.S. 50-19.1.
f. Grants temporary injunctive relief restraining the State or a political
subdivision of the State from enforcing the operation or execution of
an act of the General Assembly. This sub-subdivision only applies
where the State or a political subdivision of the State is a party in the
civil action.
g. Denies, upon the court's own motion or the motion of a party, the
transfer of an action or proceeding pursuant to Rule 42(b)(4) of the
North Carolina Rules of Civil Procedure.
(4) From any other order or judgment of the superior court from which an appeal
is authorized by statute.
(5) From any final judgment in a complex family financial case of a hearing
officer as defined in G.S. 50-110(3).
(6) From any interlocutory order or judgment of a hearing officer as defined in
G.S. 50-110(3) in a complex family financial case that does any of the
following:
a. Affects a substantial right.
b. In effect determines the action and prevents a judgment from which an
appeal might be taken.
c. Discontinues the action.
d. Grants or refuses a new trial.
e. Determines a claim prosecuted under G.S. 50-19.1.
(c) through (e) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-411, s. 1, effective August 23, 2013."
Page 8 House Bill 770-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 5. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025. The Chief Justice of the North
Carolina Supreme Court shall appoint the three hearing officers and designate the chief hearing
officer as provided for in Section 1 of this act by September 1, 2025. Notices of Designation can
be filed beginning January 1, 2026.
House Bill 770-First Edition Page 9